src/date-fin.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==================== !
! The North Sámi dates !
! ==================== !


! 12.8.
! Borgekuun guoktelot beaivi

Multichar_Symbols

@U.MONTH.1@ 
@U.MONTH.2@ 
@U.MONTH.3@ 
@U.MONTH.4@ 
@U.MONTH.5@ 
@U.MONTH.6@ 
@U.MONTH.7@ 
@U.MONTH.8@ 
@U.MONTH.9@ 
@U.MONTH.10@ 
@U.MONTH.11@ 
@U.MONTH.12@ 

+Use/NG ! For substandard month names used in Oahpa
        ! They will be accepted but not generated.

LEXICON Root

 @U.MONTH.1@:tammikuun% @U.MONTH.1@   31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.2@:helmikuun% @U.MONTH.2@     29DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.3@:maaliskuun% @U.MONTH.3@     31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.4@:huhtikuun% @U.MONTH.4@      30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.5@:toukokuun% @U.MONTH.5@     31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.6@:kesäkuun% @U.MONTH.6@     30DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.7@:heinäkuun% @U.MONTH.7@    31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.8@:elokuun% @U.MONTH.8@      31DAYS ;
 @U.MONTH.9@:syyskuun% @U.MONTH.9@     30DAYS ;
@U.MONTH.10@:lokakuun% @U.MONTH.10@    31DAYS ;
@U.MONTH.11@:marraskuun% @U.MONTH.11@    30DAYS ;
@U.MONTH.12@:joulukuun% @U.MONTH.12@    31DAYS ;


LEXICON 29DAYS
1:ensimmäinen 		     B ;
2:toinen 			     B ;
3:kolmas 		     B ;
4:neljäs 		     B ;
5:viides 			     B ;
6:kuudes 			     B ;
7:seitsemäs 			     B ;
8:kahdeksas 			     B ;
9:yhdeksäs 			     B ;
1%0:kymmenes 			     B ;
11:yhdestoista 	     B ;
12:kahdestoista     B ;
13:kolmastoista     B ;
14:neljästoista   B ;
15:viidestoista     B ;
16:kuudestoista     B ;
17:seitsemästoista      B ;
18:kahdeksastoista     B ;
19:yhdeksästoista      B ;
2%0:kahdeskymmenes 	     B ;
21:kahdeskymmenesensimmäinen   B ;
22:kahdeskymmenestoinen      B ;
23:kahdeskymmeneskolmas   B ;
24:kahdeskymmenesneljäs   B ;
25:kahdeskymmenesviides      B ;
26:kahdeskymmeneskuudes      B ;
27:kahdeskymmenesseitsemäs    B ;
28:kahdeskymmeneskahdeksas    B ;
29:kahdeskymmenesyhdeksäs     B ;

LEXICON 30DAYS
3%0:kolmaskymmenes 	     B ;
29DAYS ;

LEXICON 31DAYS
31:kolmaskymmenesensimmäinen   B ;
30DAYS ;

LEXICON B
%.:% päivä  MONTH ;

LEXICON MONTH
   1@U.MONTH.1@:@U.MONTH.1@   X ;
   2@U.MONTH.2@:@U.MONTH.2@   X ;
   3@U.MONTH.3@:@U.MONTH.3@   X ;
   4@U.MONTH.4@:@U.MONTH.4@   X ;
   5@U.MONTH.5@:@U.MONTH.5@   X ;
   6@U.MONTH.6@:@U.MONTH.6@   X ;
   7@U.MONTH.7@:@U.MONTH.7@   X ;
   8@U.MONTH.8@:@U.MONTH.8@   X ;
   9@U.MONTH.9@:@U.MONTH.9@   X ;
1%0@U.MONTH.10@:@U.MONTH.10@  X ;
 11@U.MONTH.11@:@U.MONTH.11@  X ;
 12@U.MONTH.12@:@U.MONTH.12@  X ;

LEXICON X
%.: # ;
!    # ; ! sloppy punctuation
